Maine, session 132, LD857.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1825-B, sub-§15 is enacted to read:
15. Records. Beginning January 1, 2026, the Director of the Bureau of General
Services shall preserve, consistent with applicable record retention schedules established
and published by the Department of the Secretary of State, Maine State Archives, and make
available on a publicly accessible website all records and documents regarding the
competitive bidding process, including notices of intent to waive competitive bidding under
this section and supporting documents and competitive solicitations and supporting
documents, including question-and-answer summaries, evaluation team packets and award
decision letters. All proposals submitted in response to a solicitation and resulting in an
award are public documents, unless otherwise excepted by statute.
Sec. 2. Record recovery. The Department of Administrative and Financial Services
shall to the extent possible recover and publish on a publicly accessible website all past
notices of intent to waive the competitive bidding process and supporting documents.
Page 1 - 132LR1696(03)